Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB434.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Ebony Alert System Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Alert." An Ebony Alert under the Ebony Alert System established under section 3.Section 3. Establishment and purpose of Ebony Alert System.The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish and maintain the Ebony Alert System, which shall provide prompt notification to the public, appropriate law enforcement authorities and other 1234567891011121314151617 public agencies, to assist in the recovery of young people of color who:(1) have been abducted;(2) are reported missing under unexplained or suspicious circumstances; or(3) are reported missing and are at risk or developmentally disabled, cognitively impaired or physically disabled.Section 4. Protocols and procedures.The Pennsylvania State Police shall follow the protocols and procedures necessary for the effective operation of the Ebony Alert System.Section 5. Ebony Alert System procedure.(a) Authorization.--If an individual who is a person of color is reported missing to a law enforcement agency, the law enforcement agency may immediately activate an alert across this Commonwealth if the law enforcement agency determines that the alert would be an effective tool in the investigation of the missing individual.(b) Considerations.--In making a determination under subsection (a), the law enforcement agency shall consider the following factors:(1) The missing individual is a person of color.(2) The missing individual is between 12 and 25 years of age.(3) The missing individual is developmentally disabled, cognitively impaired or physically disabled.(4) The individual is missing under circumstances that indicate that the physical safety of the individual may be endangered or that the individual may be subject to human 20250HB0434PN0417 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 trafficking.(5) The law enforcement agency determines that the individual has gone missing under unexplained or suspicious circumstances.(6) The law enforcement agency believes that:(i) the individual is in danger because of age, health, mental or physical disability or environment or weather conditions;(ii) the individual is in the company of a potentially dangerous individual; or(iii) there are other factors indicating that the individual may be in peril.(7) The investigating law enforcement agency has utilized available local resources.(8) There is information available that, if disseminated to the public, could assist in the safe recovery of the missing individual.(c) Cooperation and assistance.--(1) Radio, television, cable, satellite and social media systems are encouraged, but not required, to cooperate with disseminating the information contained in an alert.(2) Upon activation of an alert, the Department of Transportation may assist the investigating law enforcement agency by issuing additional alerts, including electronic flyers or changeable message signs.(d) Prohibited use of alerts.--The transmission, broadcast or other communication of a public alert, other than through the Ebony Alert System, intentionally, knowingly, recklessly or negligently purporting to be made by, with or through the authority of the Ebony Alert System is prohibited and shall be 20250HB0434PN0417 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.Section 6. Disposition.(a) Assessment.--Unless the court finds that undue hardship would result, in addition to any other assessment imposed by law, an assessment of $25 shall automatically be imposed on each individual convicted, adjudicated delinquent or granted Accelerated Rehabilitative Disposition for an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 29 (relating to kidnapping).(b) Use.--The assessment made under subsection (a) shall be forwarded to the Commonwealth and used by the Pennsylvania State Police to establish and maintain the Ebony Alert System.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0434PN0417 - 4 - 12345678910111213